Maryland, session 2026, HB0685.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–303.
(E) (1) IN THIS SUBSECTION, “DWELLING” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN
§ 9–105 OF THIS TITLE.
(2) THE GOVERNING BODY OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY OR OF A
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY MAY GRANT, BY LAW, A
PROPERTY TAX CREDIT UNDER THIS SUBSECTION AGAINST THE COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX IMPOSED ON A DWELLING THAT IS
OWNED BY AN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY EMPLOYEE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0685*

HOUSE BILL 685
(3) THE GOVERNING BODY OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY OR OF A
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION IN ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY MAY ESTABLISH, BY LAW:
(I) THE DEFINITION OF “ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY EMPLOYEE”
FOR PURPOSES OF ELIGIBILITY FOR THE PROPERTY TAX CREDIT;
(II) THE AMOUNT AND DURATION OF THE TAX CREDIT;
(III) PROCEDURES FOR THE APPLICATION AND UNIFORM
PROCESSING OF REQUESTS FOR THE TAX CREDIT; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER PROVISION NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBSECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.